ja: モバイルの取り付けタイプ: ベビーベッド; ストローラー; 壁; その他
da: Mobilmonteringstype: Krybbe; Klapvogn; Væg; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de montagem do móbil: Berço; Carrinho; Parede; Outro
hr-HR: Način postavljanja mobila: Dječji krevetić; Dječja kolica; Zid; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип мобилен монтаж: Детско креватче; Детска количка; Стена; Други
ko: 모바일 장착 유형: 아기 침대; 유모차; 벽; 기타
vi: Kiểu gắn di động: Giường cũi; Xe đẩy; Tường; Khác
hu: Mozgó babajáték rögzítési típusa: Gyerekágy; Babakocsi; Fal; Egyéb
pl: Typ montażu mobilnego: Łóżeczko; Wózek dziecięcy; Ściana; Inne
pt-BR: Tipo de suporte móvel: Berço; Carrinho; Parede; Outro
de: Mobile Montageart: Schenkel; Kinderwagen; Wand; Sonstiges
fr: Type de montage mobile: Berceau; Poussette; Mur; Autre
lt-LT: Muzikinės karuselės tvirtinimo tipas: Vaikiška lovelė; Vežimėlis; Siena; Kita
es: Tipo de montaje móvil: Cuna; Cochecito; Pared; Otros
zh-TW: 行動安裝類型: 幼兒床; 嬰兒車; 牆; 其他
el: Τύπος τοποθέτησης μόμπιλε: Λίκνο; Καροτσάκι μωρού; Τοίχος; Άλλο
nl: Type montage mobiel: Wieg; Wandelwagen; Muur; Andere
th: ประเภทการติดตั้งแบบเคลื่อนที่: เตียงเด็ก; รถเข็นเด็ก; ผนัง; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta montaže mobil: Zibelka; Voziček; Na steni; Drugo
ru: Тип крепления мобиля: Детская кроватка; Коляска; Стена; Другое
zh-CN: 移动安装类型: 婴儿床; 婴儿车; 墙; 其他
sv: Typ av mobilmontering: Spjälsäng; Barnvagn; Vägg; Övrigt
fi: Siirrettävä asennustyyppi: Vauvansänky; Lastenrattaat; Seinä; Muu
tr: Mobil montaj tipi: Beşik; Bebek arabası; Duvar; Diğer
it: Tipo di montaggio del mobile: Culla; Passeggino; Parete; Altro
en: Mobile mounting type: Crib; Stroller; Wall; Other
cs: Mobilní typ montáže: Postýlka; Na kočárek; Stěna; Jiné
sk-SK: Typ pripevnenia detského kolotoča: Postieľka; Kočík; Stena; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de montare carusel: Pătuț; Cărucior; Perete; Altele
nb: Mobil monteringstype: Krybbe; Barnevogn; Vegg; Annet